New Jersey, session 221, A5124.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.2024, c.45 is amended to read as follows: 1.  As used in [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Bank means the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank, established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-4). CHAMP means the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-5a). Loan origination fee means the fee charged by the bank to pay a portion of the costs incurred by the bank in the implementation of the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program. Project sponsor means a local government unit receiving a loan from the bank pursuant to [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.  Section 2 of P.L.2024, c.45 is amended to read as follows: 2. a. The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank is authorized to expend the aggregate sum of [$7,198,045] $13,813,000, or such amounts as can be supported through balances in the "Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program Revolving Loan Fund" established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.6), including any appropriations from the Legislature, for the purpose of making loans to, or on behalf of, local government units to finance all or a portion of the cost of construction of the projects listed in section 4 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The bank is authorized to increase the aggregate sum specified in subsection a. of this section by acquiring additional lending capital.  The bank is authorized to utilize the following sources of funds to acquire such lending capital or for any purpose of the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program: (1)  the amounts of interest earned pursuant to a loan made to a project sponsor participating in CHAMP; (2)  the interest earned on amounts deposited pending their distribution to project sponsors, as provided in subsection b. of section 6 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill); and (3)  the amounts of the loan origination fee, as provided in subsection c. of section 6 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and any other CHAMP fees. 3.  Section 3 of P.L.2024, c.45 is amended to read as follows: 3.    The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank is authorized to make loans to, or on behalf of, the project sponsors for the hazard mitigation and resilience projects listed in subsection a. of section 4 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), up to the individual amounts indicated and in the priority stated, except that any such amount may be reduced by the bank pursuant to subsection a. of section 6 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or if a project fails to meet the requirements of section 5 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The bank is authorized to increase any such amount pursuant to subsections b. and c. of section 6 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4.  Section 4 of P.L.2024, c.45 is amended to read as follows: 4.  a.  The following CHAMP projects shall be known and may be cited as the State Fiscal Year 2025 Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program Project Eligibility List: Applicant, Project No. Project Description Estimated Total Project Amount Estimated Total Loan Amount Jersey City, RB0906-001 McGovern Park Resilience $5,053,524 $1,360,000 Hoboken City, RB0905-001 Southwest Park Expansion $13,188,272 $1,800,000 Stafford Township, RB1531-001 Elevations $2,532,436 $570,000 Bergen County Utilities Authority, RB0200-UA-001 Flood Mitigation of Joint Meeting Pump Station $5,993,832 $1,610,000 Brick Township Municipal Utilities Authority RB1507-UA-001 Brick Reservoir Resilient Infrastructure Improvements $3,768,155 $1,040,000 Rochelle Park Township, RB0254-001 Reconstruction of Sanitary Sewer Pump Station $2,595,146 $2,140,000 Rochelle Park Township, RB0254-002 Elevations $3,364,023 $360,000 Highlands Borough RB1319-001 Highlands and Monmouth Hills Flood Mitigation and Green Infrastructure $16,205,280 $4,413,000 Marlboro Township, RB1330-001 Nolan Road Streambank Stabilization $1,757,775 $520,000 Total Projects: [6] 9 [$31,120,985] $54,458,443 [$8,000,000] $13,813,000 b.    The bank is authorized to adjust the allowable loan amount for each project authorized in this section as appropriate, provided that the total amount of loan issuance remains within available funds, and each loan is issued pursuant to the terms and conditions of the State Fiscal Year 2025 Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program. 5.  Section 5 of P.L.2024, c.45 is amended to read as follows: 5.    Any loan made by the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank pursuant to [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be subject to the requirements of this section. a.    The chairperson, vice-chairperson, or secretary of the bank shall certify that the project complies with the applicable provisions of P.L.2023, c.63, P.L.1985, c.334, and any amendatory and supplementary acts thereto, and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, as applicable, and any policy statements relating to CHAMP set forth in the State Fiscal Year 2025 CHAMP Financial Plan.  In making this certification, the chairperson, vice-chairperson, or secretary may conclusively rely on the project review conducted by the State Office of Emergency Management without any independent review thereof by the bank. b.    The loan shall be conditioned upon inclusion of the project on a project eligibility list approved pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.5). c.    The loan shall be repaid within a period not to exceed 30 years of project completion or the making of the loan. d.    The loan shall not exceed the allowable project cost of the project, exclusive of capitalized interest, administrative expenses associated with federal funding programs, if applicable, interest earned on project costs as provided in subsection b. of section 6 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the amounts of the loan origination fee as provided in subsection c. of section 6 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and increased costs as determined in accordance with the requirements of section 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.8) and any policy statements relating to CHAMP set forth in the State Fiscal Year 2025 CHAMP Financial Plan. e.    The loan shall bear interest, exclusive of any cost of issuance charges, late charges, or administrative fees payable to the bank pursuant to subsection o. of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5) and pursuant to the provisions of the Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Act, Pub. L. 116-284, by the project sponsors receiving Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program loans in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the financial plan required pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-22.5). f.     The loan shall be subject to all other terms and conditions as the bank shall determine to be consistent with the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the requirements of section 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.8), and any policy statements relating to CHAMP and the financial plan required by section 7 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-22.5).  The eligibility lists and authorization for the making of loans pursuant to [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall expire on July 1, 2025, and any project sponsor which has not executed and delivered a loan agreement with the bank for a loan authorized in [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall no longer be entitled to that loan. 6.  Section 6 of P.L.2024, c.45 is amended to read as follows: 6. a. The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank is authorized to reduce the individual amount of loan funds made available to, or on behalf of, project sponsors pursuant to section 4 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), based upon final building costs, as determined in accordance with the requirements of section 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.8) and any policy statements relating to CHAMP set forth in the State Fiscal Year 2025 CHAMP Financial Plan.  The bank is authorized to use any such reduction in the loan amount made available to a project sponsor to cover that project sponsors increased costs due to differing site conditions or other allowable expenses, as determined in accordance with the requirements of section 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.8) and any policy statements relating to CHAMP to be set forth in the State Fiscal Year 2025 CHAMP Financial Plan. b.    The bank is authorized to increase each loan amount authorized in section 4 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), by the amount of capitalized interest and interest accrued pursuant to a loan made to a project sponsor pursuant to the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program, issuance expenses, and administrative expenses associated with federal funding programs allocable to each loan made by the bank pursuant to [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.    The bank is authorized to increase each loan amount authorized in section 4 of [this act] P.L.2024, c.45, as amended by P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), by a loan origination fee. 7.  This act shall take effect immediately.